California statutes. Public Resources Code
(II) Processes that are currently in use anywhere in the world. This clause is not intended to create any conflicting or duplicative regulation of pipelines, including those governing the transportation of oil produced from onshore reserves.

(ii) “Oil” refers to crude oil before it is refined into products, including gasoline, bunker fuel, lubricants, and asphalt. Crude oil that is upgraded in quality through residue reduction or other means shall be transported as provided in subparagraphs (A) and (B).

(iii) Subparagraphs (A) and (B) shall apply only to new or expanded oil extraction operations. “New extraction operations” means production of offshore oil from leases that did not exist or had never produced oil, as of January 1, 2003, or from platforms, drilling islands, subsea completions, or onshore drilling sites, that did not exist as of January 1, 2003. “Expanded oil extraction” means an increase in the geographic extent of existing leases or units, including lease boundary adjustments, an increase in the number of well heads, reactivation of a facility idled, inactive, or out of service for more than five years, or an increase in oil extraction from the use of hydraulic fracturing, extended reach drilling, acidization, or other unconventional technologies, on or after January 1, 2003.

(6) If a state of emergency is declared by the Governor for an emergency that disrupts the transportation of oil by pipeline, oil may be transported by a waterborne vessel, if authorized by permit, in the same manner as required by emergency permits that are issued pursuant to Section 30624.

(7) In addition to all other measures that will maximize the protection of marine habitat and environmental quality, when an offshore well is abandoned, the best achievable technology shall be used.

(b) (1) Repair and maintenance of an existing oil and gas facility may be permitted in accordance with Section 30260 only if it does not result in expansion of capacity of the oil and gas facility, and if all
 applicable conditions of subdivision (a) are met.

(2) Repair, reactivation, and maintenance of an oil and gas facility, including an oil pipeline, that has been idled, inactive, or out of service for five years or more shall be considered a new or expanded development requiring a new coastal development permit consistent with this section. 

(3) Development associated with the repair, reactivation, or maintenance of an oil pipeline that has been idled, inactive, or out of service for five years or more requires a new coastal development permit consistent with this section. 

(4) The commission or local government with a certified local coastal program shall review and approve, modify,
 condition, or deny the permit based on the requirements of this section. 

(c) Where appropriate, monitoring programs to record land surface and near-shore ocean floor movements shall be initiated in locations of new large-scale fluid extraction on land or near shore before operations begin and shall continue until surface conditions have stabilized. Costs of monitoring and mitigation programs shall be borne by liquid and gas extraction operators.

(d) This section does not affect the activities of any state agency that is responsible for regulating the extraction, production, or transport of oil and
 gas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 118, Sec. 9.   (SB 237)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

30263.

(a) New or expanded refineries or petrochemical facilities shall not be considered a coastal-dependent industrial facility for the purposes of Section 30260, and may be permitted only if found to be consistent with all applicable provisions of this division.

(b) New or expanded refineries or petrochemical facilities shall minimize the need for once-through cooling by using air cooling to the maximum extent feasible and by using treated waste waters from inplant processes where feasible.

(c) Repair and maintenance of existing refineries or petrochemical facilities may be permitted in accordance with Section 30260 only if the following conditions are met:

(1) The development does not result in expansion of capacity of existing refineries or petrochemical facilities.

(2) Alternative locations are not feasible or are more environmentally damaging.

(3) Adverse environmental effects are mitigated to the maximum extent feasible.

(4) Permitting the development would not adversely affect the public welfare.

(5) The development is not located in a highly scenic or seismically hazardous area, on any of the Channel Islands, or within or contiguous to environmentally sensitive areas.

(6) The development is sited so as to provide a sufficient buffer area to minimize adverse impacts on
 surrounding property.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of this section and paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 30260, development of facilities for the purposes of producing low-carbon fuels at an existing refinery or petrochemical facility may be permitted in accordance with Section 30260 if all requirements of that section and subdivision (c) of this section are met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 292, Sec. 4.   (SB 704)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

30264.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division except subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 30413, new or expanded thermal electric generating plants may be constructed in the coastal zone if the proposed coastal site has been determined by the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission to have greater relative merit pursuant to the provisions of Section 25516.1 than available alternative sites and related facilities for an applicant’s service area which have been determined to be acceptable pursuant to the provisions of Section 25516.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1330.)
-------------------------------------------

30265.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Transportation studies have concluded that pipeline transport of oil is generally both economically feasible and environmentally preferable to other forms of crude oil transport.

(b) Oil companies have proposed to build a pipeline to transport offshore crude oil from central California to southern California refineries, and to transport offshore oil to out-of-state refiners.

(c) California refineries would need to be retrofitted if California offshore crude oil were to be used directly as a major feedstock. Refinery modifications may delay achievement of air quality goals in the southern California air basin and other regions of the state.

(d) The County of Santa Barbara has issued an Oil Transportation Plan that assesses the environmental and economic differences among various methods for transporting crude oil from offshore California to refineries.

(e) The Governor should help coordinate decisions concerning the transport and refining of offshore oil in a manner that considers state and local studies undertaken to date, that fully addresses the concerns of all affected regions, and that promotes the greatest benefits to the people of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 294, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30265.5.

(a) The Governor, or the Governor’s designee, shall coordinate activities concerning the transport and refining of offshore oil. Coordination efforts shall consider public health risks, the ability to achieve short-term and long-term air emission reduction goals, the potential for reducing California’s vulnerability and dependence on oil imports, economic development and jobs, and other factors deemed important by the Governor, or the Governor’s designee.

(b) The Governor, or the Governor’s designee, shall work with state and
 local agencies, and the public, to facilitate the transport and refining of offshore oil in a manner that will promote the greatest public health and environmental and economic benefits to the people of the state.

(c) The Governor, or the Governor’s designee, shall consult with any individual or organization having knowledge in this area, including, but not limited to, representatives from the following:

(1) State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission.

(2) State Air Resources Board.

(3) California Coastal Commission.

(4) Department of Fish and
 Wildlife.

(5) State Lands Commission.

(6) Public Utilities Commission.

(7) Santa Barbara County.

(8) Santa Barbara County Air Pollution Control District.

(9) Southern California Association of Governments.

(10) South Coast Air Quality Management District.

(11) Oil industry.

(12) Public interest groups.

(13) United States Department of the Interior.

(14) United States Department of Energy.

(15) United States Environmental Protection Agency.

(16) National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration.

(17) United States Coast Guard.

(d) This act is not intended, and shall not be construed, to decrease, duplicate, or supersede the jurisdiction, authority, or responsibilities of any local government, or any state agency or commission, to discharge its responsibilities concerning the transportation and refining of oil.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 3.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Sea Level Rise [30270. - 30270.]

30270.

The commission shall take into account the effects of sea level rise in coastal resources planning and management policies and activities in order to identify, assess, and, to the extent feasible, avoid and mitigate the adverse effects of sea level rise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 236, Sec. 2.   (SB 1)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Creation, Membership, and Powers of Commission and Regional Commissions [30300. - 30355.]



  ARTICLE 1. Creation, Membership of Commission and Regional Commission [30300. - 30305.]

30300.

There is in the Resources Agency the California Coastal Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1173, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

30301.

The commission shall consist of the following 15 members:

(a) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency.

(b) The Secretary of Transportation.

(c) The Chairperson of the State Lands Commission.

(d) Six representatives of the public from the state at large. The Governor, the Senate Committee on Rules, and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint two of these members.

(e) Six representatives selected from six coastal regions. The Governor shall select one member from the north coast
 region and one member from the south central coast region. The Speaker of the Assembly shall select one member from the central coast region and one member from the San Diego coast region. The Senate Committee on Rules shall select one member from the north central coast region and one member from the south coast region. For purposes of this division, these regions are defined as follows:

(1) The north coast region consists of the Counties of Del Norte, Humboldt, and Mendocino.

(2) The north central coast region consists of the Counties of Sonoma and Marin and the City and County of San Francisco.

(3) The central coast region consists of the Counties of San Mateo, Santa Cruz, and Monterey.

(4) The south central coast region consists of the Counties of
 San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, and Ventura.

(5) The south coast region consists of the Counties of Los Angeles and Orange.

(6) The San Diego coast region consists of the County of San Diego.

(f) Of the representatives appointed by the Governor pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e), one of the representatives shall reside in, and work directly with, communities in the state that are disproportionately burdened by, and vulnerable to, high levels of pollution and issues of environmental justice, including, but not limited to, communities with diverse racial and ethnic populations and communities with low-income populations. The Governor shall appoint a representative qualified pursuant to this subdivision to a vacant position from the appointments available pursuant to either subdivision (d) or (e) no later than the
 fourth appointment available after January 1, 2017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 578, Sec. 3.   (AB 2616)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

30301.2.

(a) The appointments of the Governor, the Senate Committee on Rules, and the Speaker of the Assembly, pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 30301, shall be made as prescribed in this section. Within 45 days from the date of receipt of a request for nominations by the appointing authority, the board of supervisors and city selection committee of each county within the region shall nominate supervisors, mayors, or city council members who reside in the region from which the Governor, the Senate Committee on Rules, or the Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint a replacement. In regions composed of three counties, the board of supervisors and the city selection committee in each county within the region shall each nominate one or more supervisors
 and one or more mayors or city council members. In regions composed of two counties, the board of supervisors and the city selection committee in each county within the region shall each nominate not less than two supervisors and not less than two mayors or city council members. In regions composed of one county, the board of supervisors and the city selection committee in the county shall each nominate not less than three supervisors and not less than three mayors or city council members. Immediately upon selecting the nominees, the board of supervisors and the city selection committee shall send the names of the nominees to either the Governor, the Senate Committee on Rules, or the Speaker of the Assembly, whoever will appoint the replacement.

(b) Within 30 days from the date of receipt of the names of the nominees pursuant to subdivision (a), the Governor, the Speaker of the Assembly, or the Senate Committee on Rules, whoever will appoint
 the replacement, shall either appoint one of the nominees or notify the boards of supervisors and city selection committees within the region that none of the nominees are acceptable and request the boards of supervisors and city selection committees to make additional nominations. Within 45 days from the date of receipt of a notice rejecting all of the nominees, the boards of supervisors and city selection committees within the region shall nominate and send to the appointing authority the names of additional nominees in accordance with subdivision (a). Upon receipt of the names of those additional nominees, the appointing authority shall appoint one of the nominees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 683, Sec. 38.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

30301.5.

A member of the commission serving pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 30301 shall be a nonvoting member and may appoint a designee to serve at the member’s pleasure who shall have all the powers and duties of the member pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 4.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30304.

(a) Any member of the commission may, subject to the confirmation of the member’s appointing power, appoint an alternate member to represent
 the member at any commission meeting. An alternate for a locally elected official need not also be a locally elected official. An alternate may serve before confirmation for a period not to exceed 90 days from the date of appointment unless and until confirmation is specifically refused. The alternate shall serve at the pleasure of the member who appointed them and shall have all the powers and duties as a member of the commission, except that the alternate shall only participate and vote in meetings in the absence of the member who appointed
 them.

(b) All provisions of law relating to conflicts of interest that are applicable to a member shall apply to an alternate member. Whenever a member has, or is known to have, a conflict of interest on any matter, the member’s alternate is not eligible to vote on that matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 5.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30305.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, the commission shall succeed to any and all obligations, powers, duties, responsibilities, benefits, or legal interests of regional coastal commissions which existed prior to July 1, 1981.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1173, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Qualifications and Organization [30310. - 30319.5.]

30310.

In making their appointments pursuant to this division, the Governor, the Senate Committee on Rules, and the Speaker of the Assembly shall make good faith efforts to assure that their appointments, as a whole, reflect, to the greatest extent feasible, the economic, social, and geographic diversity of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 163.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

30312.

The term of office of commission members shall be as follows:

(a) (1) A person appointed by the Governor and qualified for membership because the person holds a specified office as a locally elected official shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. However, the membership shall cease 60 days after the member’s
 term of office as a locally elected official ceases, or when a person has been appointed to fill that position by the Governor, if that occurs sooner.

(2) A person appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules or by the Speaker of the Assembly and qualified for membership because the person holds a specified office as a locally elected official shall serve a term of four years. However, the membership shall cease 60 days after the member’s term of office as a locally elected official ceases, if that occurs sooner.

(b) (1) A member appointed by the Governor shall serve for two years at the pleasure of the Governor, and may be reappointed for succeeding two-year periods, provided that the member may continue to serve beyond the two-year term until the Governor has acted and the appointee is authorized to sit and serve on the commission.

(2) A member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules or the Speaker of the Assembly shall serve for four years, and may be reappointed for succeeding four-year periods, provided that the member may continue to serve beyond the four-year term until the member’s
 appointing authority has acted and the appointee is authorized to sit and serve on the commission. If the Senate Committee on Rules or the Speaker of the Assembly has not acted within 60 days after the expiration of a member’s term, the position shall become vacant until a person is appointed to a four-year term, calculated from the expiration date of the preceding term.

(c) If a vacancy occurs before the expiration of the term for the vacated seat, the appointing authority shall appoint a member for the remainder of the unexpired term pursuant to this chapter.

(d) On the effective date of the act adding this subdivision, the Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of
 the Assembly shall each appoint two members to serve two-year terms and two members to serve four-year terms. All subsequent terms shall be for four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 6.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30313.

(a) Vacancies that occur shall be filled within 30 days after the occurrence of the vacancy, and shall be filled in the same manner in which the vacating member was selected or appointed.

(b) The executive director of the commission shall notify the appropriate appointing authority of any expected vacancies on the commission. If the expected vacancy is a person qualified for membership because he or she holds a specified office as a locally elected official, whose term of office as a locally elected official is expected to expire or has expired, then the appointing authority shall notify the boards of supervisors and city selection committees of each county within the affected region of the expected vacancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1469, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

30314.

(a) Except as provided in this section, members or alternates of the commission shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties to the extent that reimbursement for those expenses is not otherwise provided or payable by another public agency or agencies, and shall receive fifty dollars ($50) for each full day of attending meetings of the commission. In addition, members or alternates of the commission shall receive twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50) for each hour actually spent in preparation for a commission
 meeting, provided
 that for each meeting no more than eight hours of preparation time shall be compensated as provided in this section.

(b) An alternate shall be entitled to payment and reimbursement for the necessary expenses incurred in participating in commission
 meetings, provided that only the member or the member’s alternate shall receive that payment and reimbursement, and if both the member and alternate prepare for, attend, and participate in any portion of a commission meeting, only the alternate shall be entitled to that payment and reimbursement.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “full day of attending a
 meeting” means presence at, and participation in, not less than 60 percent of the total meeting time of the commission during any particular 24-hour period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 7.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30315.

(a) The commission shall meet at least 11 times annually at a place convenient to the public. Each meeting shall occur not more than 45 working days after the previous meeting. All meetings of the commission shall be open to the public.

(b) A majority of the total appointed membership of the commission shall constitute a quorum. An action taken by the commission under this division requires a majority vote of the members present at the meeting of the commission, with a quorum being present, unless otherwise specifically provided for in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 546, Sec. 29.   (SB 1473)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

30315.1.

Adoption of findings for any action taken by the commission requires a majority vote of the members from the prevailing side present at the meeting of the commission, with at least three of the prevailing members present and voting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 590.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

30315.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, the commission shall make the notice of any public meeting or hearing of the commission available in both English and Spanish, and may also make the notice available in any other language.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 866, Sec. 1.   (AB 288)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

30316.

The commission shall elect a chairperson and vice chairperson from among its members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

30317.

The headquarters of the commission shall be in a coastal county, but it may meet and may exercise any or all of its powers in any part of the state. The commission may maintain regional offices, if it finds that accessibility to, and participation by, the public will be better served or that the provisions of this division can be implemented more efficiently through the maintenance of those offices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 285, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

30318.

This division shall not preclude or prevent a member or employee of the commission who is also an employee of another public agency, a county supervisor or city councilperson, member of the Association of Bay Area Governments, member of the Association of Monterey Bay Area
 Governments, member of a joint powers authority, member of a local agency formation commission, delegate to the Southern California Association of Governments, or member of the San Diego Association of Governments, and who has in that designated capacity voted or acted upon a particular matter, from voting or otherwise acting upon that matter as a member or employee of the commission. This section shall not exempt a member or employee of the commission from any other provision of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 108, Sec. 1.   (SB 360)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

30319.

Any person who applies to the commission for approval of a development permit shall provide the commission with the names and addresses of all persons who, for compensation, will be communicating with the commission or commission staff on the applicant’s behalf or on behalf of the applicant’s business partners. That disclosure shall be provided to the commission prior to any such communication. Failure to comply with that disclosure requirement is a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, the person shall be punished by a fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, and, in addition, shall be subject to immediate denial of the permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 798, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

30319.5.

An applicant whose permit is denied due to the applicant’s failure to comply with Section 30319 may not apply to the commission for approval of an identical or similar project for two years from the date of the permit denial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 8.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Fairness and Due Process [30320. - 30329.]

30320.

(a) The people of California find and declare that the duties, responsibilities, and quasi-judicial actions of the commission are sensitive and extremely important for the well-being of current and future generations and that the public interest and principles of fundamental fairness and due process of law require that the commission conduct its affairs in an open, objective, and impartial manner free of undue influence and the abuse of power and authority. It is further found that, to be effective, California’s coastal protection program requires public awareness, understanding, support, participation, and confidence in the commission and its practices and procedures. Accordingly, this article is necessary to preserve the public’s welfare and the integrity of, and to maintain the public’s trust in, the commission and the implementation of this division.

(b) The people of California further find that in a democracy, due process, fairness, and the responsible exercise of authority are all essential elements of good government which require that the public’s business be conducted in public meetings, with limited exceptions for sensitive personnel matters and litigation, and on the official record. Reasonable restrictions are necessary and proper to prevent future abuses and misuse of governmental power so long as all members of the public are given adequate opportunities to present their views and opinions to the commission through written or oral communications on the official record either before or during the public hearing on any matter before the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1114, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

30321.

For purposes of this article, “a matter within the commission’s jurisdiction” means any permit action, federal consistency review, appeal, local coastal program, port master plan, public works plan, long-range development plan, categorical or other exclusions from coastal development permit requirements, or any other quasi-judicial matter requiring commission action, for which an application has been submitted to the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1114, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

30322.

(a) For purposes of this article, except as provided in subdivision (b), an “ex parte communication” is any oral or written communication between a member of the commission and an interested person, about a matter within the commission’s jurisdiction, which does not occur in a public hearing, workshop, or other official proceeding, or on the official record of the proceeding on the matter.

(b) The following communications are not ex parte communications:

(1) Any communication between a staff member acting in
 their official capacity and any commission member or interested person.

(2) Any communication limited entirely to procedural issues, including, but not limited to, the hearing schedule, location, format, or filing date.

(3) Any communication that takes place on the record during an official proceeding of a state, regional, or local agency that involves a member of the commission who also serves as an official of that agency.

(4) Any communication between a member of the commission, with regard to any action of another state agency or of a regional or local agency of which the member
 is an official, and any other official or employee of that agency, including any person who is acting as an attorney for the agency.

(5) Any communication between a nonvoting commission member and a staff member of a state agency where both the commission member and the staff member are acting in an official capacity.

(6) Any communication to a nonvoting commission member relating to an action pending before the commission, where the nonvoting commission member does not participate in that action, either through written or verbal communication, on or off the record, with other members of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 9.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30323.

For purposes of this article, an “interested person” is any of the following:

(a) Any applicant, an agent or an employee of the applicant, or a person receiving consideration for representing the applicant, or a participant in the proceeding on any matter before the commission.

(b) Any person with a financial interest, as described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 87100) of Chapter 7 of Title 9 of the Government Code, in a matter before the commission, or an agent or employee of the person with a financial interest, or a person receiving consideration for representing the person with a financial interest.

(c) A representative acting on behalf of any civic, environmental, neighborhood, business, labor, trade, or similar organization who intends to influence the decision of a commission member on a matter before the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1114, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

30324.

(a) No commission member, nor any interested person, shall conduct an ex parte communication unless the commission member fully discloses and makes public the ex parte communication by providing a full report of the communication to the executive director within seven days after the communication or, if the communication occurs within seven days of the next commission hearing, to the commission on the record of the proceeding at that hearing.

(b) (1) The commission shall adopt standard disclosure forms for reporting ex parte communications which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(A) The date, time, and location of the communication.

(B) (i) The identity of the person or persons initiating and the person or persons receiving the communication.

(ii) The identity of the person on whose behalf the communication was made.

(iii) The identity of all persons present during the communication.

(C) A complete, comprehensive description of the content of the ex parte communication, including a complete set of all text and graphic material that was part of the communication.

(2) The executive director shall place in the public record any report of an ex parte communication.

(c) Communications shall cease to be ex parte communications when fully disclosed and placed in the commission’s official record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 125, Sec. 1.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

30325.

Nothing in this article prohibits any person or any interested person from testifying at a commission hearing, workshop, or other official proceeding, or from submitting written comments for the record on a matter before the commission. Written comments shall be submitted by mail or delivered to a commission office, or may be delivered to the commission at the time and place of a scheduled hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1114, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

30326.

Any person, including a commission member, may request the commission staff to conduct a workshop on any matter before the commission or on any subject that could be useful to the commission. When the executive director determines that a request is appropriate and feasible, a workshop shall be scheduled at an appropriate time and location.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1114, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

30327.

(a) No commission member or alternate shall make, participate in making, or any other way attempt to use their official position to influence a commission decision about which the member or alternate has knowingly had an ex parte communication that has not been reported pursuant to Section 30324.

(b) In addition to any other applicable penalty, including a civil fine imposed pursuant to Section 30824, a commission member who knowingly violates this section shall be subject to a civil fine, not to exceed seven thousand five
 hundred dollars ($7,500). Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the court may award attorneys’ fees and costs to the prevailing party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 10.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30327.5.

(a) An interested person shall not give, convey, or make available gifts aggregating more than ten dollars ($10) in a calendar month to a commissioner or a member of the commission’s staff.

(b) A commissioner or member of the commission’s staff shall not accept gifts aggregating more than ten dollars ($10) in a calendar month from an interested person.

(c) For purposes of this section, “interested person” shall have the same meaning as the term is defined in Section 30323.

(d) For purposes of this section, “gift” means, except as provided in subdivision (e), a payment, as defined in Section 82044 of the Government Code, that confers a personal benefit on the recipient, to the extent that consideration of equal or greater value is not received and includes a rebate or discount in the price of anything of value unless the rebate or discount is made in the regular course of business to members of the public without regard to official status. A person, other than a defendant in a criminal action, who claims that a payment is not a gift by reason of receipt of consideration has the burden of proving that the consideration received is of equal or greater value.

(e) For purposes of this section, “gift” does not include any of the following:

(1) A gift that is not used and that, within 30 days after receipt, is either returned to the donor or delivered to a nonprofit entity exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, without being claimed as a charitable contribution for tax purposes.

(2) A gift from an individual’s spouse, child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, brother, sister, parent-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, nephew, niece, aunt, uncle, or first cousin, or the spouse of one of those individuals. However, a gift from one of those people shall be considered a gift if the donor is acting as an agent or intermediary for a person not covered in this paragraph.

(3) A cost associated with the provision of evidentiary material provided to the commission and its staff.

(4) An educational or training activity that has received prior approval from the commission.

(5) A field trip or site inspection that is made available on equal terms and conditions to all commissioners and appropriate staff.

(6) A reception or purely social event that is not offered in connection with or is not intended to influence a decision or action of the commission and that is open to all commissioners, members of the staff, and members of the public and press.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 188.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

30327.6.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a person who for compensation attempts to influence or affect the outcome of a commission decision or action and who violates Section 30327.5 may, in addition to any other applicable penalty, be barred from any activity seeking to influence or affect the outcome of a commission decision or action for a period of up to one year from the date of the finding of the violation. Each violation shall be grounds for the person being barred from any activity seeking to influence or affect a commission decision or action for an additional year from the date of conviction.

(2) This section does not prohibit an individual from representing
 the individual’s own self in seeking to influence or affect the outcome of a commission decision or action if that individual is acting solely on their own personal behalf and not on behalf of another person or entity.

(b) A person who violates Section 30327.5 shall, in addition to any other applicable penalty, be subject to a civil fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 97, Sec. 11.   (SB 1497)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

30328.

If a violation of this article occurs and a commission decision may have been affected by the violation, an aggrieved person, as described in Section 30801, may seek a writ of mandate from a court requiring the commission to revoke its action and rehear the matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1114, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

30329.

Notwithstanding Section 11425.10 of the Government Code, the ex parte communications provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Article 7 (commencing with Section 11430.10) of Chapter 4.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) do not apply to proceedings of the California Coastal Commission under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 938, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 98 of Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Powers and Duties [30330. - 30344.]

30330.
